Montana, session 2025, HB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 69-3-332, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-3-332. Digital asset mining and data center ratemaking -- reporting requirement. (1) The
commission may not establish a rate classification for digital asset mining, digital asset mining businesses, or
home digital asset mining that creates unduly discriminatory rates.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Data center" means a use involving a building or premises in which the majority of the use is
occupied by computers, telecommunications, or related equipment, including supporting equipment, where
information is processed, transferred, and stored.
(b) "Digital asset mining" means the use of electricity to power a computer for the purpose of
securing a blockchain network.
(c) "Digital asset mining business" means a group of computers working at a single site that
consume more than 1 megawatt of energy on an average annual basis for the purpose of generating digital
assets by securing a blockchain network.
(d) "Discriminatory rates" means electricity rates substantially different from other industrial similar
uses of electricity in similar geographic areas after accounting for the cost of service.
(e) "Home digital asset mining" means mining digital assets in areas zoned for residential use that
consume less than 1 megawatt of energy on an average annual basis for the purpose of generating digital
assets by securing a blockchain network.
(3) By March 1 of each year, any data center or digital mining business operating in the state,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 263

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 263.1
excluding home digital asset mining, shall report to the commission and the energy and telecommunications
interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210:
(a) the total megawatt-hours of electricity consumed in the previous calendar year; and
(b) the anticipated megawatt-hours of electricity needed for the current calendar year."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 263